Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.600.205

Interscholastic activities—Appeals from noneligibility issues—Appeals committee—Appeals to Washington interscholastic activities association executive board—Limitations on penalties and sanctions.

(1)(a) The Washington interscholastic activities association shall establish a nine-person appeals committee to address appeals of noneligibility issues. The committee shall be comprised of the secretary from each of the activity districts of the Washington interscholastic activities association. The committee shall begin hearing appeals by July 1, 2006. No committee member may participate in the appeal process if the member was involved in the activity that was the basis of the appeal.

(b) Any penalty or sanction that is imposed or upheld by the appeals committee must be proportional to the offense and must be imposed upon only the offending individual or individuals, including coaches, school district administrators, school administrators, and students. However, only the Washington interscholastic activities association executive board has the authority to remove a team from postseason competition. Should a school violate a Washington interscholastic activities association rule, that violation does not automatically remove that school's team from postseason competition. Penalties levied against coaches and school programs must be considered before removing a team from postseason competition. Removal of a team from postseason competition must be the last option.

(2)(a) A decision of the appeals committee may be appealed to the executive board of the association. If a matter is appealed to the executive board, then the board shall conduct a de novo review of the matter before making a decision.

(b) Any penalty or sanction that is imposed or upheld by the executive board must be proportional to the offense and must be imposed upon only the offending individual or individuals including coaches, school district administrators, school administrators, or students. However, only the Washington interscholastic activities association executive board has the authority to remove a team from postseason competition. Should a school violate a Washington interscholastic activities association rule, that violation does not automatically remove that school's team from postseason competition. Penalties levied against coaches and school programs must be considered before removing a team from postseason competition. Removal of a team from postseason competition must be the last option.

(c) If a rule violation is reported to the association within ten days of the relevant postseason play, then the only review shall be conducted by the executive board of the Washington interscholastic activities association so that a decision can be rendered in a timely manner. The executive board must take all possible actions to render a decision before the postseason play takes place.

[ 2012 c 155 s 3; 2006 c 263 s 905.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—Short title—2012 c 155: See notes following RCW 28A.600.200.

Findings—Purpose—Part headings not law—2006 c 263: See notes following RCW 28A.150.230.